Utah statutes.
36-22-2.   Duties.

(1)  The committee shall:

(a)  serve as a liaison between Utah Native American tribes and the Legislature;

(b)  recommend legislation for each annual general session of the Legislature if the committee determines that modifications to current law are in the best interest of the state of Utah and of the Utah Native American tribes;

(c)  review the operations of the Division of Indian Affairs and other state agencies working with Utah Native American tribes;

(d)  help sponsor meetings and other opportunities for discussion with and between Native Americans.

(2)  In conducting its business, the committee shall comply with the rules of legislative interim committees.

